Oklahoma, session 2026, SB636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 593 of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. It shall be unlawful for any state entity or political
subdivision of this state, or any branch, division, foundation,
contractor, or affiliate of a political subdivision of this state,
to expend any monies, funds, or resources, directly or indirectly,
for:
1. Publicity or propaganda purposes opposing rights as stated
in the Second Amendment to the Constitution of the United States;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB636 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Preparation, distribution, or use of any kit, pamphlet,
booklet, publication, electronic communication, radio, television or
video presentation, or other audiovisual presentation or material
designed to defeat the enactment of:
a. legislation before any federal or state governmental
entity relating to rights as stated in the Second
Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, or
b. any proposed or pending rule, regulation,
administrative action, or order issued by any federal
or state governmental entity relating to rights as
stated in the Second Amendment to the Constitution of
the United States; or
3. Employment, retention, or use of an executive or legislative
lobbyist or legislative liaison, as such terms are defined in the
Rules of the Ethics Commission, to support or defeat the enactment,
repeal, or amendment of any legislation, rule, regulation,
administrative action, or order by any federal or state governmental
entity in opposition to rights as stated in the Second Amendment to
the Constitution of the United States.
B. No individual, state entity, or political subdivision of
this state, or any branch, division, foundation, contractor, or
affiliate of a political subdivision of this state, shall use any
monies, funds, or resources, directly or indirectly, to pay the
salary or expenses of any public employee or grant or contract
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB636 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

reci pient, or agent acting on behalf of such recipient, related to
any activity designed to influence the enactment, repeal, or
amendment of legislation, an appropriation, a regulation, an
administrative action, a rule, or an executive order proposed or
pending before any federal or state governmental entity in
opposition to rights as stated in the Second Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States.
C. The use of public property, resources, employees, networks,
or time shall be considered to be the use of funds pursuant to the
provisions of this section.
D. The prohibitions in subsections A and B of this section
shall include any activity to advocate or promote any proposed,
pending, or future:
1. Federal or state tax, fine, or fee increase relating to
rights as stated in the Second Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States; or
2. Requirement or restriction on any legal consumer product,
including its sale or marketing, relating to rights as stated in the
Second Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
E. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment in the county jail
for a term not exceeding one (1) year, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB636 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
1. Any person elected to a state, county, or municipal office
or any person who is appointed to fill a vacancy in a state, county,
or municipal office;
2. Any person presenting neutral testimony on behalf of an
organization; or
3. Any person stating a personal opinion while presenting
testimony and the person is not testifying in his or her official
capacity.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS













SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB636 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)